Missouri, session 2026, HB1638.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 191.116, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 191.116, to read as follows:
191.116. 1. There is hereby established in the department of health and senior
services the "Alzheimer's State Plan Task Force". The task force shall consist of [twenty-one]
twenty-two members, as follows:
(1) The lieutenant governor, or his or her designee, who shall serve as chair of the
task force;
(2) The directors of the departments of health and senior services, social services, and
mental health, or their designees;
(3) One member of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(4) One member of the senate to be appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
(5) One member who has early-stage Alzheimer's disease or a related dementia;
(6) One member who is a family caregiver of a person with Alzheimer's disease or a
related dementia;
(7) One member who is a licensed physician with experience in the diagnosis,
treatment, and research of Alzheimer's disease;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1638 2
(8) One member from the office of state ombudsman for long-term care facility
residents;
(9) One member representing [residential long-term care] licensed residential care
facilities;
(10) One member representing licensed assisted living facilities;
(11) One member representing the home care profession;
[(11)] (12) One member representing the adult day services profession;
[(12)] (13) One member representing the area agencies on aging;
[(13)] (14) One member with expertise in minority health;
[(14)] (15) One member representing the law enforcement community;
[(15)] (16) One member from the department of higher education and workforce
development with knowledge of workforce training;
[(16)] (17) Two members representing voluntary health organizations in Alzheimer's
disease care, support, and research;
[(17)] (18) One member representing licensed skilled nursing facilities; and
[(18)] (19) One member representing Missouri veterans' homes.
2. The members of the task force, other than the lieutenant governor, members from
the general assembly, and department and division directors, shall be appointed by the
governor [with the advice and consent of the senate]. Members shall serve on the task force
without compensation.
3. (1) The term of any member of the task force appointed before August 28,
2026, shall expire on December 31, 2026. Each member of the task force appointed after
December 31, 2026, shall serve a term of two years, except the first members appointed
after December 31, 2026, who shall serve staggered terms as follows:
(a) Members appointed under subdivisions (5) to (13) of subsection 1 of this
section shall serve one-year terms; and
(b) Members appointed under subdivisions (14) to (19) of subsection 1 of this
section shall serve two-year terms.
(2) If a vacancy occurs, a replacement shall be appointed to serve for the
remainder of the departing member's term.
(3) Members of the task force described in subdivisions (1) to (4) of subsection 1
of this section shall not be subject to the provisions of this subsection.
4. The task force shall assess all state programs that address Alzheimer's disease and
update and maintain an integrated state plan to overcome the challenges caused by
Alzheimer's disease. The state plan shall include implementation steps and recommendations
for priority actions based on this assessment. The task force's actions shall include, but shall
not be limited to, the following:

HB 1638 3
(1) Assess the current and future impact of Alzheimer's disease on residents of the
state of Missouri;
(2) Examine the existing services and resources addressing the needs of persons with
Alzheimer's disease and their families and caregivers;
(3) Develop recommendations to respond to the escalating public health crisis
regarding Alzheimer's disease;
(4) Ensure the inclusion of ethnic and racial populations that have a higher risk for
Alzheimer's disease or are least likely to receive care in clinical, research, and service efforts,
with the purpose of decreasing health disparities in Alzheimer's disease treatment;
(5) Identify opportunities for the state of Missouri to coordinate with federal
government entities to integrate and inform the fight against Alzheimer's disease;
(6) Provide information and coordination of Alzheimer's disease research and
services across all state agencies;
(7) Examine dementia-specific training requirements across health care, adult
protective services workers, law enforcement, and all other areas in which staff are involved
with the delivery of care to those with Alzheimer's disease and other dementias; and
(8) Develop strategies to increase the diagnostic rate of Alzheimer's disease in
Missouri.
[4.] 5. The task force shall deliver a report of recommendations to the governor and
members of the general assembly no later than January 1, 2023.
[5.] 6. The task force shall continue to meet at the request of the chair and at a
minimum of one time annually for the purpose of conducting any additional assessments
deemed appropriate and evaluating the implementation and impact of the task force
recommendations and shall provide annual supplemental report updates on the findings to the
governor and the general assembly.
[6.] 7. Before January 1, 2029, and every five years thereafter, the task force
shall deliver a report of recommendations, which shall be based on its findings in
subsection 6 of this section and any additional assessments conducted since its last
report, to the governor and members of the general assembly.
8. The provisions of this section shall expire on December 31, [2027] 2033.
✔